Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Primaries
118.226.
Filling vacancy in candidacy for Lieutenant Governor.

If a vacancy occurs in a candidacy for the office of Lieutenant Governor because of death, disqualification to hold the office sought, or a severe disabling condition that arose after the slate formed a campaign committee, the candidate for the office of Governor on that slate may designate a replacement for the vacant candidate.

The designation of a replacement shall be on forms filed with the Secretary of State, but only following certification to the candidate for the office of Governor by the Secretary of State that a vacancy exists for a reason specified in subsection (1) of this section.

If a replacement candidate for a vacancy in candidacy for Lieutenant Governor is made for a reason specified in subsection (1) of this section after the ballots are printed for the regular election, notices informing the voters of the change in composition of the slate shall be posted at each precinct polling place.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 88, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

118.227.
Method for filling vacancy in slate of candidates before primary election. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 105, § 16, effective March 16, 2005; 2008, ch. 79, § 12, effective July 15, 2008; repealed by 2020 ch. 88, § 12, effective July 15, 2020.

118.230.
Ballot
boxes — Adoption — Specifications — Locks — Delivery
to election officers. [Repealed.]

118.235.
Publication
of names of candidates by county clerk. [Repealed.]

118.240.
Challengers
at regular election. [Repealed.]

118.245.
Number of votes necessary to nominate candidates — Section not applicable to presidential primaries.

The candidate for office receiving the highest number of votes in a primary for the office for which he or she is a candidate shall be the nominee of his or her party for that office and shall receive the certificate of nomination.

If two (2) or more candidates in a primary are found to have received the highest and an equal number of votes for nomination to the same office, the election shall be determined by lot in the manner the board directs, in the presence of not less than three (3) other persons. This section does not apply to presidential primaries.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 114; 1982, ch. 394, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 63, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 185, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 29, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 288, § 41, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2020 ch. 88, § 7, effective July 15, 2020.

118.250.
Written
oath of voter when qualifications questioned — Grand jury to investigate
oaths. [Repealed.]

118.255.
Fees.

The Secretary of State shall receive a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for a candidate for statewide elected state office or the Congress, two hundred dollars ($200) for a candidate for Commonwealth’s attorney, the General Assembly, or the District Court, Circuit Court, Court of Appeals, or Supreme Court, twenty dollars ($20) for candidates for a city office, fifty dollars ($50) for other candidates who file with the Secretary of State for each notification and declaration and petition filed with him, and fifty dollars ($50) for a write-in candidate for office, to be paid by the candidate, or the candidate’s representative, when the notification and declaration and petition or declaration of intent is filed.

The county clerk shall receive a fee pursuant to KRS

64.012

for each notification and declaration and petition filed with him to be paid by the candidate at the time of the filing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 115; 1976, ch. 7, § 3; 1978, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 288, § 58, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 34, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 88, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 105, § 1, effective March 16, 2005; 2014, ch. 92, § 212, effective January 1, 2015.

118.260.
Hearing
witnesses as to qualifications of voter — Challenge by another voter.
[Repealed.]

118.270.
Precinct
sheriff to preserve order at polls, enforce laws and act as umpire. [Repealed.]

118.280.
Issuance
and marking of ballot. [Repealed.]

118.290.
Casting
ballot — Voting to be prompt. [Repealed.]

118.300.
Voting
by illiterate, blind or disabled voter. [Repealed.]